Indiana, session 2026, SB287.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-10.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]:
Chapter 10.2. Exemptions for Indiana Nonprofit Senior Living
Communities
Sec. 1. It is the intent of the general assembly that Indiana
nonprofit senior living communities identified in this chapter that
also meet the requirements set out in this chapter be exempt from
property taxation, including real and tangible property.
Sec. 2. All or part of a building is exempt from property
taxation if it is owned by an Indiana nonprofit entity that is:
(1) registered as a continuing care retirement community
under IC 23-2-4;
(2) defined as a small house health facility under
IC 16-18-2-331.9; or
(3) licensed as a health care or residential care facility under
IC 16-28.
2026 IN 287—LS 7123/DI 120


Sec. 3. Tangible personal property is exempt from property
taxation if it is owned by an Indiana nonprofit entity that is:
(1) registered as a continuing care retirement community
under IC 23-2-4;
(2) defined as a small house health facility under
IC 16-18-2-331.9; or
(3) licensed as a health care or residential care facility under
IC 16-28.
SECTION 2. [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]
(a) IC 6-1.1-10.2, as added by this act, applies to assessment dates
occurring after December 31, 2025, for property taxes first due and
payable in 2027.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2030.
SECTION 3. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 287—LS 7123/DI 120